Maryland, session 2025, HB0425.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
8–701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) (1) “Dealer” means any person who:
(i) Engages in whole or in part in the business of buying, selling, or
exchanging new and unused vessels or used vessels, or both, either outright or on
conditional sale, bailment, lease, chattel mortgage, or otherwise; and
(ii) Has an established place of business for sale, trade, and display
of vessels.
(2) “Dealer” includes:
(i) A yacht broker; and
– 1 –

Ch. 556 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) A holder of a lien created under Title 16, Subtitle 2 of the
Commercial Law Article who sells the vessel pursuant to that title, including [an
auctioneer and] a company commonly known as a lien and recovery company.
(3) “DEALER” DOES NOT INCLUDE A LICENSED AUCTIONEER ACTING
ON BEHALF OF A SELLER, SECURED PARTY, OR OWNER AND WHERE TITLE DOES NOT
PASS TO THE AUCTIONEER AND THE AUCTION IS NOT FOR THE PURPOSE OF
AVOIDING THE PROVISIONS OF THIS TITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 2 –